en: Refillable Makeup Palettes & Cases
xx: Refillable Makeup Palettes & Cases
cs: Plnitelné kosmetické palety a pouzdra
da: Genopfyldelige makeuppaletter og -beholdere
de: Nachfüllbare Make-up-Paletten & -Koffer
es: Paletas y estuches de maquillaje rellenables
fr: Palettes et boîtes de maquillage rechargeables
it: Astucci e custodie ricaricabili per il trucco
ja: 詰替用メイクアップケース・パレット
nl: Navulbare make-updozen en -paletten
no: Gjenfyllbare sminkepaletter og -beholdere
pl: Wielorazowe palety do makijażu
pt: Estojos de maquiagem com refil
ru: Пустые палитры и наборы для макияжа
sv: Påfyllningsbara sminkpaletter och -fodral
tr: Doldurulabilir Makyaj Paletleri ve Kutuları

en: Nail Tools
xx: Nail Tools
cs: Pomůcky na nehty
da: Negleredskaber
de: Maniküre & Pediküre
es: Objetos para uñas
fr: Accessoires pour les ongles
it: Accessori cura delle unghie
ja: ネイルケア用品
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor nagelverzorging
no: Negleverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do paznokci
pt: Ferramentas para unhas
ru: Инструменты для ухода за ногтями
sv: Nagelverktyg
tr: Tırnak Bakım Aletleri

en: Cuticle Pushers
xx: Cuticle Pushers
cs: Kleštičky na kůži
da: Neglebåndsskubbere
de: Nagelhautschieber
es: Empujacutículas
fr: Repousse-cuticules
it: Tagliacuticole
ja: キューティクルプッシャー
nl: Bokkenpootjes
no: Neglebåndpressere
pl: Kopytka do skórek
pt: Empurradores de cutículas
ru: Палочки для кутикулы
sv: Nagelbandstrimrar
tr: Manikür Çubukları

en: Cuticle Scissors
xx: Cuticle Scissors
cs: Nůžky na kůžičku
da: Neglebåndsklippere
de: Nagelhautscheren
es: Tijeras para cutículas
fr: Coupe-cuticules
it: Spingicuticole
ja: キューティクルニッパー
nl: Nagelriemknippers
no: Neglebåndsakser
pl: Nożyczki do skórek
pt: Alicates de cutículas
ru: Ножницы для кутикулы
sv: Nagelbandssaxar
tr: Manikür Makasları

en: Manicure & Pedicure Spacers
xx: Manicure & Pedicure Spacers
cs: Separátory prstů
da: Tådelere til pedicure
de: Finger- & Zehenspreizer
es: Separadores de manicura y pedicura
fr: Séparateurs de doigts pour manucure et pédicure
it: Separatori di dita per manicure e pedicure
ja: ペディキュア用トゥセパレーター
nl: Teenscheiders voor voetverzorging
no: Separatorer for manikyr og pedikyr
pl: Separatory palców do pedicure
pt: Separador de dedos para pedicure
ru: Разделители пальцев для педикюра
sv: Tåseparatorer för pedikyr
tr: Manikür ve Pedikür Parmak Ayraçları

en: Manicure Tool Sets
xx: Manicure Tool Sets
cs: Sady na manikúru
da: Redskabssæt til manicure
de: Maniküre-Sets
es: Juegos de útiles para manicura
fr: Kits de manucure
it: Set per manicure
ja: マニキュアセット
nl: Manicuresets
no: Sett med manikyrverktøy
pl: Zestawy do manicure
pt: Conjuntos de utensílios para manicure
ru: Маникюрные наборы
sv: Manikyretuier
tr: Manikür Alet Setleri

en: Nail Buffers
xx: Nail Buffers
cs: Brusné bloky na nehty
da: Neglepolerere
de: Nagelpolierer
es: Limas abrillantadoras
fr: Polissoirs
it: Lucida unghie
ja: ネイルバッファー・爪磨き
nl: Nagelbuffers
no: Neglebuffere
pl: Polerki do paznokci
pt: Polidores de unhas
ru: Полировщики для ногтей
sv: Nagelpolerare
tr: Tırnak Parlatıcı Törpüler

en: Nail Clippers
xx: Nail Clippers
cs: Kleště na nehty
da: Negleklippere
de: Nagelknipser
es: Cortaúñas
fr: Coupe-ongles
it: Tronchesini
ja: 爪切り
nl: Nagelschaartjes
no: Negleklippere
pl: Cążki do paznokci
pt: Cortadores de unhas
ru: Кусачки для ногтей
sv: Nagelsaxar
tr: Tırnak Makasları

en: Nail Drill Accessories
xx: Nail Drill Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k bruskám na nehty
da: Tilbehør til neglebor
de: Nagelpiercing-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para pulidoras de uñas
fr: Accessoires de ponceuses à ongles
it: Accessori fresa per unghie
ja: ネイルマシン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor nagelboren
no: Tilbehør til neglebor
pl: Akcesoria do frezarek do paznokci
pt: Acessórios de lixa elétrica
ru: Принадлежности для дрелей для ногтей
sv: Tillbehör till nagelborrar
tr: Elektrikli Törpü Aksesuarları

en: Nail Drills
xx: Nail Drills
cs: Brusky na nehty
da: Neglebor
de: Nagelfräser
es: Perforadoras para uñas
fr: Ponceuses à ongles
it: Frese per unghie
ja: ネイルマシン
nl: Nagelboren
no: Neglebor
pl: Wiertła do paznokci
pt: Lixa elétrica de unha
ru: Дрели для ногтей
sv: Nagelborrar
tr: Elektrikli Törpüler

en: Nail Dryers
xx: Nail Dryers
cs: Sušičky nehtů
da: Negletørrere
de: Nageltrockner
es: Secadores de uñas
fr: Séchoirs à ongles
it: Asciugaunghie
ja: ネイルドライヤー
nl: Nageldrogers
no: Negletørkere
pl: Suszarki do paznokci
pt: Secadores de unhas
ru: Сушки для ногтей
sv: Nageltorkare
tr: Oje Kurutucular

en: Nail Files & Emery Boards
xx: Nail Files & Emery Boards
cs: Pilníky a špachtle
da: Neglefiler og sandfiler
de: Nagelfeilen & Sandblattfeilen
es: Limas de uñas y limas de esmeril
fr: Limes à ongles et limes émeri
it: Limette per unghie
ja: ネイルファイル・爪やすり
nl: Nagelvijlen
no: Neglefiler og sandpapirfiler
pl: Pilniczki
pt: Lixas comuns e lixas metálicas de unhas
ru: Пилки для ногтей
sv: Nagelfilar och sandpappersfilar
tr: Tırnak Törpüleri ve Kağıt Törpüler

en: Skin Care Tools
xx: Skin Care Tools
cs: Pomůcky pro péči o kůži
da: Redskaber til hudpleje
de: Hautpflegeutensilien
es: Objetos para el cuidado de la piel
fr: Accessoires pour le soin de la peau
it: Accessori cura della pelle
ja: スキンケア用品
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor huidverzorging
no: Hudpleieverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do pielęgnacji twarzy
pt: Ferramentas para cuidados com a pele
ru: Инструменты для ухода за кожей
sv: Verktyg för hudvård
tr: Cilt Bakım Aletleri

en: Facial Saunas
xx: Facial Saunas
cs: Obličejové sauny
da: Ansigtssaunaer
de: Gesichtssaunas
es: Saunas faciales
fr: Sauna facial
it: Saune viso
ja: スチーム美顔器
nl: Gezichtsauna's
no: Ansiktssaunaer
pl: Sauny do twarzy
pt: Saunas faciais
ru: Сауны для лица
sv: Ansiktssaunor
tr: Yüz Saunaları

en: Foot Files
xx: Foot Files
cs: Pilníky na paty
da: Fodfiler
de: Fußfeilen
es: Limas para pies
fr: Râpes à pieds
it: Lime per i piedi
ja: かかと用やすり
nl: Eeltvijlen
no: Fotfiler
pl: Pilniki do stóp
pt: Lixa para pés
ru: Пилки для стоп
sv: Fotraspar
tr: Ayak Törpüleri

en: Lotion & Sunscreen Applicators
xx: Lotion & Sunscreen Applicators
cs: Pomůcky pro nanášení pleťové vody a krémů
da: Påførselsanordninger til lotion og solcreme
de: Applikatoren für Lotionen und Sonnenschutzcremes
es: Artículos para aplicar lociones y protectores solares
fr: Applicateurs de lotion et de crème solaire
it: Applicatori di lozioni e creme solari
ja: ローション/日焼け止めアプリケーター
nl: Applicators voor lotion en zonnebrandcrème
no: Lotion- og solkremapplikatorer
pl: Aplikatory balsamu i kremu do opalania
pt: Aplicadores de loção e filtro solar
ru: Аппликаторы для солнцезащитных средств
sv: Hudkräm och solskyddskräm
tr: Losyon ve Güneş Kremi Uygulayıcıları

en: Pumice Stones
xx: Pumice Stones
cs: Pemzy
da: Pimpsten
de: Bimssteine
es: Piedras pómez
fr: Pierres ponces
it: Pietre pomice
ja: 軽石
nl: Puimstenen
no: Pimpesteiner
pl: Pumeksy
pt: Pedras-pomes
ru: Пемза
sv: Pimpsten
tr: Ponza Taşları

en: Skin Care Extractors
xx: Skin Care Extractors
cs: Nástroje na odstranění uhrů
da: Tænger til hudpleje
de: Mitesser-Entferner
es: Extractores para cuidado de la piel
fr: Extracteurs pour le soin de la peau
it: Estrattori per la cura della pelle
ja: 角栓除去・毛穴ケア
nl: Gezichtverzorgingsproducten
no: Hudpleieekstraktorer
pl: Przyrządy do usuwania zaskórników
pt: Removedores de impurezas
ru: Экстракторы угрей
sv: Pormaskborttagare
tr: Siyah Nokta Çıkarma Aletleri

en: Skin Care Rollers
xx: Skin Care Rollers
cs: Rolery na péči o pokožku
da: Ruller til hudpleje
de: Hautpflegeroller
es: Rodillos para el cuidado de la piel
fr: Rouleaux pour le soin de la peau
it: Rulli per la cura della pelle
ja: 美顔ローラー
nl: Huidrollers
no: Hudpleievalser
pl: Masażery do twarzy
pt: Rolos dermatológicos
ru: Ролики для ухода за кожей
sv: Hudvårdsrullar
tr: Cilt Bakım Ruloları

en: Skin Cleansing Brush Heads
xx: Skin Cleansing Brush Heads
cs: Hlavice na kartáčky na čištění pleti
da: Penselhoveder til ansigtsrens
de: Hautreinigungs-Bürstenköpfe
es: Cabezales de cepillos de limpieza facial
fr: Têtes de brosses pour la peau
it: Teste per spazzole per la pulizia della pelle
ja: 洗顔ブラシ用替えブラシ
nl: Losse huidreinigingsborsteltjes
no: Børstehoder for hudrens
pl: Głowice do szczotek do oczyszczania twarzy
pt: Cabeças de escovas para limpeza de pele
ru: Головки щёток для очистки кожи
sv: Borsthuvuden till hudrengöring
tr: Cilt Temizleme Fırçası Başlıkları